Florida, session 2026, SB7008.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSection 16.716, Florida Statutes, is amended to 13 read: 14 16.716âFlorida Gaming Control Commission public records and 15 public meetings exemptions.â 16 (1)(a)âAny information obtained by the Florida Gaming 17 Control Commission which is exempt or confidential and exempt 18 from s. 119.07(1) or s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution 19 shall retain its exempt or confidential and exempt status. The 20 information may be released by the commission, upon written 21 request, to an agency, as defined in s. 119.011, or a 22 governmental entity in the performance of the commissionâs 23 official duties and responsibilities. An agency or a 24 governmental entity receiving such information from the 25 commission shall maintain the exempt or confidential and exempt 26 status of the information. 27 (2)(b)1.âAny portion of a meeting of the commission during 28 which information that is exempt or confidential and exempt is 29 discussed is exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the 30 State Constitution. 31 (a)a.âThe chair of the commission shall advise the 32 commission at a public meeting that, in connection with the 33 performance of a commission duty, it is necessary that the 34 commission hear or discuss information that is exempt or 35 confidential and exempt. 36 (b)b.âThe chairâs declaration of necessity for closure and 37 the specific reasons for such necessity shall be stated in 38 writing in a record that shall be a public record and shall be 39 filed with the official records of the commission. 40 (c)c.âThe entire closed session shall be recorded. The 41 recording shall include the times of commencement and 42 termination of the closed session, all discussion and 43 proceedings, and the names of all persons present. No portion of 44 the session may be off the record. Such recording shall be 45 maintained by the commission. 46 (d)2.âOnly members of the commission, Department of Legal 47 Affairs staff, or commission staff supporting the commissionâs 48 function and other persons whose presence is necessary for the 49 presentation of exempt or confidential and exempt information 50 shall be allowed to attend the exempted portions of the 51 commission meetings. The commission shall ensure that any 52 closure of its meetings as authorized by this subsection 53 paragraph is limited so that the general policy of this state in 54 favor of public meetings is maintained. 55 (e)3.âA recording of, and any minutes and records generated 56 during, that portion of a commission meeting which is closed to 57 the public pursuant to this subsection paragraph are 58 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I 59 of the State Constitution until such time as the information is 60 no longer exempt or confidential and exempt. 61 (2)âThis section is subject to the Open Government Sunset 62 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and is repealed on 63 October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through 64 reenactment by the Legislature. 65 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.